Vermont, session 2025-2026, H455.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 1 V.S.A. § 371 is amended to read:
§ 371. LEGAL HOLIDAYS
(a) The following shall be legal holidays:
(1) New Year’s Day, January 1;
(2) Martin Luther King, Jr.’s Birthday, the third Monday in January;
(3) Presidents’ Day, the third Monday in February;
(4) Town Meeting Day, the first Tuesday in March;
(5) Memorial Day, the last Monday in May;
(6) Juneteenth, June 19;
(7) Independence Day, July 4;
VT LEG #381191 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.455
2025 Page 2 of 3
(8) Bennington Battle Day, August 16;
(9) Labor Day, the first Monday in September;
(10) Indigenous Peoples’ Day, the second Monday in October;
(11) Veterans’ Day, November 11;
(12) Thanksgiving Day, the fourth Thursday in November;
(13) Christmas Day, December 25.
(b)(1) All State departments, agencies and offices shall observe any legal
holiday which that falls on a Saturday on the preceding Friday and any legal
holiday which that falls on a Sunday on the following Monday; however,
except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, all other conditions of
employment related to legal holidays, including decisions such as the closing
or opening of State offices and compensation for work performed on such a
day, shall be proper matters for collective bargaining pursuant to 3 V.S.A.
§ 904.
(2) All State departments, agencies, and offices shall close in
observance of the legal holiday of Juneteenth, and compensation for work
performed on the holiday shall be in accordance with the relevant provisions in
the collective bargaining agreement.
(c) The provisions of this section shall not affect any collective bargaining
agreement in existence on the effective date hereof.
VT LEG #381191 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.455
2025 Page 3 of 3
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #381191 v.1